Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB38.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "recreational vehicle show," "recreational vehicle off-premise sale," "recreational vehicle exhibition" or "recreational vehicle rally" in section 102 of the act of December 22, 1983 (P.L.306, No.84), known as the Board of Vehicles Act, is amended to read:Section 102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:123456789101112131415161718192021222324 * * *["Recreational vehicle show," "recreational vehicle off-premise sale," "recreational vehicle exhibition" or "recreational vehicle rally." A sale, show, exhibition or rally, held by one or more recreational vehicle dealers, distributors, manufacturers or manufacturers' representatives who display, sell or attempt to sell recreational vehicles for a fixed and limited period of time, which shall not exceed ten days in a calendar month, 20 days in three consecutive calendar months and 60 days in a calendar year. Set-up and tear-down days and days when the events are not open shall be excluded from the calculation of the applicable time period.]* * *Section 2. Section 318(40) of the act is amended to read:Section 318. Grounds for disciplinary proceedings.In addition to any criminal or civil penalties otherwise provided in this act, the board shall have the power to formally reprimand, suspend or revoke any license or refuse to issue or renew any license of an applicant or licensee or a person required to be licensed under this act, if after due notice of and hearing, the person charged is found in violation of or fails to carry out the acts and procedures set forth in this act or is found guilty of committing or attempting to commit any of the acts set forth in section 322 or any of the following acts:* * *(40) Being an out-of-State recreational vehicle dealer who fails to demonstrate, upon direction of or investigation by the board or its agents, that the out-of-State recreational vehicle dealer satisfies the provisions of section [332.1(c) regarding participation in this 20250HB0038PN0017 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Commonwealth in a recreational vehicle show, recreational vehicle off-premise sale, recreational vehicle exhibition or recreational vehicle rally] 511.1(c) regarding participation in this Commonwealth in a recreational vehicle event.Section 3. Sections 332.1 and 333 of the act are repealed:[Section 332.1. Recreational vehicle shows, recreational vehicle off-premise sales, recreational vehicle exhibitions and recreational vehicle rallies.(a) Participation.--A recreational vehicle dealer, salesperson, distributor, manufacturer or manufacturer's representative licensed under this act may participate in a recreational vehicle show, recreational vehicle off-premise sale, recreational vehicle exhibition or recreational vehicle rally. A recreational vehicle dealer shall be permitted to conduct a recreational vehicle show, recreational vehicle exhibition or recreational vehicle rally at its established place of business.(b) Bond required.--Any person acting as a recreational vehicle dealer in this Commonwealth shall have posted a bond payable to the Commonwealth in the amount of $30,000 to ensure compliance with all Commonwealth laws and regulations. The bond shall be executed by a surety company authorized to transact business in this Commonwealth. The bond shall be security for any claim filed by an agency of the Commonwealth, for moneys due, including unpaid taxes, fees, licenses, payment of a criminal penalty or fine after conviction or payment of a civil penalty or monetary amount after the entry of judgment. The bond shall remain valid until canceled in writing by the issuer. This provision shall not limit the authority of any government agency or private individual to institute civil, criminal or 20250HB0038PN0017 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 disciplinary action against a person for a violation of a Commonwealth law or regulation. A recreational vehicle dealer who has a current bond in the amount of at least $30,000 on file with the Department of Transportation shall not be required to post a bond under this subsection.(c) Out-of-State recreational vehicle dealers.--An out-of-State recreational vehicle dealer licensed in another state or jurisdiction or domiciled in another state or jurisdiction that does not require licensure shall register with the board on a form prescribed by the board before participating in this Commonwealth in a recreational vehicle show, recreational vehicle off-premise sale, recreational vehicle exhibition or recreational vehicle rally. The following apply:(1) Registration shall include all of the following:(i) Notification of the out-of-State recreational vehicle dealer's intent to participate in this Commonwealth in a recreational vehicle show, recreational vehicle off-premise sale, recreational vehicle exhibition or recreational vehicle rally.(ii) Agreement to comply with all Federal and State laws and regulations relating to the buying, selling, exchanging, titling, registration or financing of recreational vehicles.(iii) Agreement by the out-of-State recreational vehicle dealer to submit to the jurisdiction of the Commonwealth for purposes of disciplinary action of imposition of a civil or criminal penalty or assessment under subsection (b) resulting from a violation under subparagraph (ii).(iv) Evidence of the posting of a bond under 20250HB0038PN0017 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subsection (b).(v) Payment of a participation fee.(vi) A list of all individuals engaged as sales people for the out-of-State recreational vehicle dealer while operating in this Commonwealth.(2) If the board has taken action within the last five years to sanction an out-of-State recreational vehicle dealer, the board may:(i) refuse to accept the registration and participation fee of the out-of-State recreational vehicle dealer permanently or for a fixed period; and(ii) order that the out-of-State recreational vehicle dealer be denied access to all recreational vehicle shows, recreational vehicle off-premise sales, recreational vehicle exhibitions and recreational vehicle rallies in this Commonwealth.(3) An out-of-State recreational vehicle dealer licensed in another state or jurisdiction or domiciled in a state or jurisdiction that does not require licensure may participate in this Commonwealth in a recreational vehicle show, recreational vehicle off-premise sale, recreational vehicle exhibition or recreational vehicle rally under the circumstances set forth either in subparagraph (i) or (ii):(i) When the show, sale, exhibition or rally has less than a total of 50 recreational vehicle dealers participating with permission of the dealer's licensed manufacturer and meets all of the following requirements:(A) A minimum of ten recreational vehicle dealers at the show are licensed in this Commonwealth.20250HB0038PN0017 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (B) More than 50% of the participating recreational vehicle dealers are licensed in this Commonwealth.(C) The state in which the out-of-State recreational vehicle dealer is licensed is contiguous to this Commonwealth and permits recreational vehicle dealers licensed in this Commonwealth to participate in recreational vehicle shows in that state under conditions substantially equivalent to the conditions imposed upon dealers from that state to participate in recreational vehicle shows in this Commonwealth.(ii) When the recreational vehicle show, sale, exhibition or rally opens to the public, it has a total of at least 50 recreational vehicle dealers from this Commonwealth and from another state participating with permission of the dealer's licensed manufacturer and meets all of the following requirements:(A) The show, sale, exhibition or rally is trade oriented and predominantly funded by recreational vehicle manufacturers.(B) All of the participating dealers who are not licensed in this Commonwealth are from a state contiguous to this Commonwealth which permits recreational vehicle dealers licensed in this Commonwealth to participate in recreational vehicle shows in that state under conditions substantially equivalent to the conditions imposed upon dealers from that state to participate in recreational vehicle shows in this Commonwealth.(4) The board shall report a violation of Pennsylvania 20250HB0038PN0017 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 law or regulation to the state or jurisdiction in which the out-of-State recreational vehicle dealer is licensed or domiciled.(5) Forms for out-of-State recreational vehicle dealers shall be published in the Pennsylvania Bulletin and shall be maintained on the board's Internet website.(6) The board may accept registration information and payment electronically.(7) An out-of-State recreational vehicle dealer may not participate in a recreational vehicle show, recreational vehicle off-premise sale, recreational vehicle exhibition or recreational vehicle rally in this Commonwealth, unless the out-of-State recreational vehicle dealer satisfies at least four of the listed activities at its facility in the contiguous state in which it is licensed or domiciled that does not require licensure:(i) Accepting delivery of new recreational vehicles from the recreational vehicle dealer's manufacturer for which the recreational vehicle dealer possesses an agreement with the manufacturer to sell its new recreational vehicles.(ii) Maintaining inventory and offering recreational vehicles for sale to the public.(iii) Consummating and finalizing recreational vehicle sales.(iv) Servicing or repairing recreational vehicles.(v) Delivering recreational vehicles to purchasers with recreational vehicle titling, registrations issued and taxes collected and paid to the dealer's appropriate home state agencies.20250HB0038PN0017 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 333. Off-premise sales, shows, exhibitions or rallies on Sundays.(1) The following shall be permitted to be open on Sundays:(i) Off-premise vehicle sales, shows and exhibitions.(ii) Recreational vehicle shows, recreational vehicle off-premise sales, recreational vehicle exhibitions and recreational vehicle rallies.(2) Except as provided in paragraphs (3) and (4), normal vehicle business practices shall be allowed at off-premise sales, vehicle shows or exhibitions on Sunday except that no final sales contract may be consummated on a Sunday.(3) Normal vehicle business practices shall be allowed at recreational vehicle shows, recreational vehicle off-premise sales, recreational vehicle exhibitions and recreational vehicle rallies. Recreational vehicle dealers are permitted to consummate final sales contracts on Sundays.(4) Manufactured housing dealers are permitted to consummate final sales contracts on Sundays.]Section 4. Section 502 of the act is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 502. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Recreational vehicle event." A recreational vehicle show, off-premise sale, exhibition or rally held by more than one participating licensed dealer or manufacturer who display, sell 20250HB0038PN0017 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or attempt to sell recreational vehicles for a fixed and limited period of time which does not exceed 10 calendar days in a month, 20 days in three consecutive calendar months and 60 days in a calendar year. For the purpose of this definition, setup and teardown days and days when the events are not open shall be excluded from the calculation of the applicable time period.* * *Section 5. Section 508(a), (b), (c) and (f) of the act are amended and subsection (h) is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 508. Warranty obligations.(a) General rule.--Each warrantor shall:(1) Specify in writing to each of its dealer obligations, if any, for preparation, delivery and warranty service on its products.(2) Compensate the dealer for warranty service required of the dealer by the warrantor.[(3) Provide to the dealer the schedule of compensation to be paid and the time allowances for the performance of work and service. The schedule of compensation must include reasonable compensation for diagnostic work as well as warranty labor.](4) Permit the dealer to purchase warranty parts from a supplier other than the warrantor.(5) Identify parts to be returned by the dealer at the beginning of warranty repair process.(b) Time allowances and compensation.--Time allowances for the diagnosis and performance of warranty labor must be reasonable for the work to be performed. [In the determination of what constitutes reasonable compensation under this section, 20250HB0038PN0017 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the principal factors to be given consideration shall be the actual wage rates being paid by the dealer and the actual retail labor rate being charged by the dealers in the community in which the dealer is doing business. The compensation of a dealer for warranty labor may not be less than the posted labor rates actually charged by the dealer for similar nonwarranty labor as long as the rates are reasonable.] Compensation for labor used for warranty service, including diagnostics and repairs, shall be at a dealer's retail rate. A dealer's hourly retail rate for labor shall be established by the dealer submitting the lesser of the following orders to the manufacturer or distributor, which cover repairs made no more than 180 days before the submission:(1) One hundred sequential nonwarranty customer-paid service repair orders.(2) Ninety consecutive days of nonwarranty customer-paid service repair orders.(c) Reimbursement.--The warrantor shall reimburse the dealer for the following:(1) All warranty parts at actual wholesale cost plus a minimum 30% handling charge and [the cost] all shipping costs, including return shipping costs, if any, [of freight] to return warranty parts to the warrantor.(2) A minimum 30% handling charge of the wholesale cost of warranty parts if the parts were sent to the dealer at no charge.* * *(f) Warrantor notification.--If a dealer receives a [written or verbal] complaint from a consumer relative to a warranty repair, the dealer must notify the warrantor about the complaint 20250HB0038PN0017 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 in writing within [10] 60 business days of [receiving the complaint] scheduled repairs if the dealer cannot satisfy the consumer's complaint.* * *(h) Violation.--It is a violation of this chapter for a warrantor to:* * *(7) Change the warranty of a recreational vehicle once the dealer has taken possession of the recreational vehicle.* * *Section 6. The act is amended by adding sections to read:Section 511.1. Recreational vehicle events.(a) Participation.--A recreational vehicle dealer, salesperson, distributor, manufacturer or manufacturer's representative licensed under this act may participate in a recreational vehicle event. A recreational vehicle dealer shall be permitted to conduct a recreational vehicle event at its esta blished place of business. E xcept when a recreational vehicle dealer or salesperson is participating in a recreational vehicle event under subsection (c)(3)(i) or (ii), a recreational vehicle dealer or salesperson may not participate in a recreational vehicle event outside of the dealer's area of sales responsibility if the dealer is the only participating dealer in the event.(b) Bond required.--Any person acting as a recreational vehicle dealer in this Commonwealth shall have posted a bond payable to the Commonwealth in the amount of $30,000 to ensure compliance with all Commonwealth laws and regulations. The bond shall be executed by a surety company authorized to transact business in this Commonwealth. The bond shall be security for 20250HB0038PN0017 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 any claim filed by an agency of the Commonwealth, for moneys due, including unpaid taxes, fees, licenses, payment of a criminal penalty or fine after conviction or payment of a civil penalty or monetary amount after the entry of judgment. The bond shall remain valid until canceled in writing by the issuer. This provision shall not limit the authority of any government agency or private individual to institute civil, criminal or disciplinary action against a person for a violation of a Commonwealth law or regulation. A recreational vehicle dealer who has a current bond in the amount of at least $30,000 on file with the Department of Transportation shall not be required to post a bond under this subsection.(c) Out-of-State recreational vehicle dealers.--An out-of-State recreational vehicle dealer licensed in another state or jurisdiction or domiciled in another state or jurisdiction that does not require licensure shall register with the board on a form prescribed by the board before participating in this Commonwealth in a recreational vehicle event. The following apply:(1) Registration shall include all of the following:(i) Notification of the out-of-State recreational vehicle dealer's intent to participate in this Commonwealth in a recreational vehicle event.(ii) Agreement to comply with all Federal and State laws and regulations relating to the buying, selling, exchanging, titling, registration or financing of recreational vehicles.(iii) Agreement by the out-of-State recreational vehicle dealer to submit to the jurisdiction of the Commonwealth for purposes of disciplinary action of 20250HB0038PN0017 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 imposition of a civil or criminal penalty or assessment under subsection (b) resulting from a violation under subparagraph (ii).(iv) Evidence of the posting of a bond under subsection (b).(v) Payment of a participation fee.(vi) A list of all individuals engaged as sales people for the out-of-State recreational vehicle dealer while operating in this Commonwealth.(2) If the board has taken action within the last five years to sanction an out-of-State recreational vehicle dealer, the board may:(i) refuse to accept the registration and participation fee of the out-of-State recreational vehicle dealer permanently or for a fixed period; and(ii) order that the out-of-State recreational vehicle dealer be denied access to all recreational vehicle events in this Commonwealth.(3) An out-of-State recreational vehicle dealer licensed in another state or jurisdiction or domiciled in a state or jurisdiction that does not require licensure may participate in this Commonwealth in a recreational vehicle event under the circumstances specified either in subparagraph (i) or (ii):(i) When the event has less than a total of 50 recreational vehicle dealers participating with permission of the dealer's licensed manufacturer and meets all of the following requirements:(A) A minimum of 10 recreational vehicle dealers at the event are licensed in this Commonwealth.20250HB0038PN0017 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (B) More than 50% of the participating recreational vehicle dealers are licensed in this Commonwealth.(C) The state in which the out-of-State recreational vehicle dealer is licensed is contiguous to this Commonwealth and permits recreational vehicle dealers licensed in this Commonwealth to participate in recreational vehicle events in that state under conditions substantially equivalent to the conditions imposed upon dealers from that state to participate in recreational vehicle events in this Commonwealth.(ii) When the recreational vehicle event opens to the public, it has a total of at least 50 recreational vehicle dealers from this Commonwealth and from another state participating with permission of the dealer's licensed manufacturer and meets all of the following requirements:(A) The event is trade oriented and predominantly funded by recreational vehicle manufacturers.(B) All of the participating dealers who are not licensed in this Commonwealth are from a state contiguous to this Commonwealth which permits recreational vehicle dealers licensed in this Commonwealth to participate in recreational vehicle events in that state under conditions substantially equivalent to the conditions imposed upon dealers from that state to participate in recreational vehicle events in this Commonwealth.(4) The board shall report a violation of Pennsylvania 20250HB0038PN0017 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 law or regulation to the state or jurisdiction in which the out-of-State recreational vehicle dealer is licensed or domiciled.(5) Forms for out-of-State recreational vehicle dealers shall be transmitted to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin and shall be maintained on the board's publicly accessible Internet website.(6) The board may accept registration information and payment electronically.(7) An out-of-State recreational vehicle dealer may not participate in a recreational vehicle event in this Commonwealth, unless the out-of-State recreational vehicle dealer satisfies at least four of the listed activities at its facility in the contiguous state in which it is licensed or domiciled that does not require licensure:(i) Accepting delivery of new recreational vehicles from the recreational vehicle dealer's manufacturer for which the recreational vehicle dealer possesses an agreement with the manufacturer to sell its new recreational vehicles.(ii) Maintaining inventory and offering recreational vehicles for sale to the public.(iii) Consummating and finalizing recreational vehicle sales.(iv) Servicing or repairing recreational vehicles.(v) Delivering recreational vehicles to purchasers with recreational vehicle titling, registrations issued and taxes collected and paid to the dealer's appropriate home state agencies.20250HB0038PN0017 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 511.2. Recreational vehicle events on Sundays.The following shall apply:(1) Recreational vehicle events shall be permitted to be open on Sundays.(2) Except as provided in paragraphs (3) and (4), normal vehicle business practices shall be allowed at recreational vehicle events on Sunday except that no final sales contract may be consummated on a Sunday.(3) Normal vehicle business practices shall be allowed at recreational vehicle events. Recreational vehicle dealers are permitted to consummate final sales contracts on Sundays.(4) Manufactured housing dealers are permitted to consummate final sales contracts on Sundays.Section 7. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0038PN0017 - 16 - 1234567891011121314